Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-542
Savings clause.

The Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before January 1, 2021.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 43.